Oklahoma, session 2026, SB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 8012, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 8012. A. The Legislative Office of Fiscal Transparency


shall:


1. Gather information regarding the proposed budgets of


executive branch agencies each fiscal year;


2. Analyze the information and evaluate the extent to which the


agency budget does or does not fulfill the agency’s primary duties


and responsibilities under applicable provisions of federal, state,


or other law;



Req. No. 144 Page 1


3. Analyze and forecast all revenues available to the agency


from appropriations, fees, dedicated revenue, or any other source;


4. Compare the agency budget information to the comparable


information contained in that agency’s budget requests from prior


fiscal years; and


5. Conduct such investigations regarding the operations of the


agency as required in order to fulfill the duties imposed upon the


Office by law or as otherwise directed by the oversight committee;


and


6. Analyze and conduct performance evaluations as it relates to


the administrative code of executive branch agencies, as outlined in


Section 2 of this act.


The oversight committee, subject to the direction of the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, shall ensure that the functions performed by the


Office pursuant to the provisions of this subsection do not


duplicate those of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the


House Committee on Appropriations and Budget and their respective


staffs.


B. The Office shall further conduct performance evaluations and


may conduct independent comprehensive performance audits. The


oversight committee created in Section 3 of this act 8013 of this


title may periodically identify specific executive branch agencies,


or programs, activities, or functions within executive branch

Req. No. 144 Page 2


agencies, for which the Office shall conduct a performance


evaluation or independent comprehensive performance audit.


C. As used in this act Section 8011 et seq. of this title,


“performance evaluation” means an examination of a program,


activity, or function of an executive branch agency, conducted in


accordance with applicable government auditing standards or auditing


and evaluation standards of other appropriate authoritative bodies.


The term includes, but is not limited to, an examination of issues


related to:


1. Economy, efficiency, or effectiveness of the agency or


program, including any revenue sources used to fund or support the


agency or program;


2. Structure or design of the agency or program to accomplish


its goals and objectives;


3. Adequacy of the agency or program to meet the needs or


policy goals identified by the Legislature;


4. Alternative methods of providing agency or program services


or products;


5. Goals, objectives, and performance measures used by the


agency to monitor and report agency or program accomplishments;


6. The accuracy or adequacy of public documents, reports, or


requests prepared by or in relation to the agency or program;


7. Compliance with appropriate policies, rules, or laws related


to the agency or program; and

Req. No. 144 Page 3


8. Any other issues related to such agencies or programs as


directed by the oversight committee.


D. As used in this act Section 8011 et seq. of this title,


“independent comprehensive performance audit (ICPA)” includes, but


is not limited to, a review and analysis of the economy, efficiency,


effectiveness, and compliance of the policies, management, fiscal


affairs, and operations of state agencies, divisions, programs, and


accounts. The results of an ICPA may be used by the Legislature to


implement the best budgeting and policy-making practices for


government services to run in the most cost-effective way. The


Office may, at the direction of the oversight committee and subject


to the approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the


Speaker of the House of Representatives, contract with a private


company, nonprofit organization, or academic institution to assist


with an independent comprehensive performance audit or for


professional consulting and administrative support services. The


Office may, but shall not be required to, contract with the Office


of the State Auditor and Inspector to conduct any ICPA. The Office


shall develop the scope of services for a request for proposals


issued, for professional services necessary to complete each ICPA.


Prior to entering into any contract, the Office shall obtain no less


than three separate bids for the auditing services, unless the


Office determines that fewer than three entities meet the


qualifications to bid to perform such services as set forth by the

Req. No. 144 Page 4


Office. The cost of the contract shall be paid by the Legislative


Services Service Bureau.


An independent comprehensive performance audit shall address but


not be limited to the following topics:


1. Policies which shall include constitutional mandates, if


any, statutory mandates, statutory authorizations, administrative


rules or policies of the affected agency reflected in internal


agency documents, or agency practices;


2. All sources of funding received by the agency, inclusive of


federal funds, state appropriations, state-dedicated revenues, fee


revenue sources, the use of agency revolving funds, or any other


fund or revenue source which is used to pay the expenses of the


agency;


3. Management of the agency which shall include, but not be


limited to, its governance, capacity, divisions, programs, accounts,


information technology systems, and policies and agency operations


which include objective analysis of the roles and functions of the


department; and


4. A schedule for implementation of agency-specific


recommendations.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8016 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 144 Page 5


A. The Legislative Office of Fiscal Transparency shall, within


ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act, establish a


division within the Office for the purpose of reviewing the Oklahoma


Administrative Code and proposed administrative rules of state


agencies. The Office may employ no more than five full-time


employees to service the division and carry out the functions


outlined in this section.


B. The administrative rules division of the Office shall


evaluate the following:


1. Whether proposed permanent administrative rules align with


the Oklahoma Constitution;


2. Whether proposed permanent rules fulfill the legislative


intent of the statute that authorized the permanent rulemaking;


3. Whether the proposed permanent rules will have a negative


impact that is disproportionate to the intended effects of the


rulemaking; and


4. Whether the agency has the statutory authority to promulgate


the proposed permanent rules.


C. The division shall issue a report including the information


provided in subsection B of this section, a summary statement of the


legislative recommendation being made, and any other information


deemed necessary by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the


Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the Administrative Rules


Committee chairs of the Senate or the House of Representatives.

Req. No. 144 Page 6


D. The division shall also be responsible for regular


evaluations of existing provisions of the administrative code in


coordination with the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the


Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Administrative


Rules Committee chairs of the Senate and the House of


Representatives.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-144 RD 1/19/2025 5:37:35 AM























Req. No. 144 Page 7